Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.220

Effect of supreme court judgments.

The judgments and decrees of the supreme court shall be final and conclusive upon all the parties properly before the court.

[ 1890 p 323 s 8; RRS s 14.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR-Rule 3.